Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 5
NEW CONSTRUCTION - EXTENSION

Section

40-5-101. New construction - extension - compliance with local zoning rules.

A public utility shall not begin the construction of a new facility, plant, or system or the extension of its facility, plant, or system without first obtaining from the commission a certificate that the present or future public convenience and necessity require, or will require, the construction or extension. For purposes of this subsection (1), the present or future public convenience and necessity does not include the consideration of land use rights or siting issues related to the location or alignment of the proposed electric transmission lines or associated facilities, which issues are under the jurisdiction of a local government's land use regulation. Sections 40-5-101 to 40-5-104 do not require a corporation to secure a certificate for the following:

An extension within any city and county, city, or town within which it has already lawfully commenced operations;

An extension into territory, either within or outside of a city and county, city, or town, contiguous to its facility, line, plant, or system and not already served by a public utility providing the same commodity or service; or

An extension within or to territory already served by the corporation, as is necessary in the ordinary course of its business.

If a public utility, in constructing or extending its line, plant, or system, interferes, or is about to interfere, with the operation of the line, plant, or system of any other public utility already constructed, the commission, upon complaint of the public utility claiming to be injuriously affected, after hearing, may prohibit the construction or extension or prescribe just and reasonable terms and conditions for the location of the lines, plants, or systems affected.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that there is or will be a duplication of service by public utilities in any area, the commission may issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity assigning specific territories to one or to each of said utilities or, by certificate of public convenience and necessity, otherwise define the conditions of rendering service and constructing extensions within those territories and may order the elimination of the duplication upon such terms as are just and reasonable, having due regard to due process of law and to all the rights of the respective parties and to public convenience and necessity.

Except as otherwise provided in section 29-20-108, C.R.S., a public utility shall not construct or install a new facility, plant, or system within the territorial boundaries of a local government unless the construction or installation complies with the local government's zoning rules, resolutions, or ordinances. Nothing in this subsection (3) prohibits a local government from granting a variance from its zoning rules, resolutions, or ordinances for such uses of the property. Nothing in this subsection (3) grants the commission any additional authority to restrict a siting application. For purposes of this section, "local government" means a county, home rule or statutory city, town, territorial charter city, or city and county. Nothing in this subsection (3) restricts the right of a public utility or power authority to appeal to the public utilities commission a local government action under section 29-20-108, C.R.S.

A public utility is entitled to recover, through a separate rate adjustment clause, the costs that it prudently incurs in planning, developing, and completing the construction or expansion of transmission facilities for which the utility has been granted a certificate of public convenience and necessity, or for which the commission has determined that no certificate of public convenience and necessity is required. The transmission rate adjustment clause is subject to annual changes, which are effective on January 1 of each year.

To provide additional encouragement to utilities to pursue the construction and expansion of transmission facilities, the commission shall approve current recovery by the utility through the annual rate adjustment clause of the utility's weighted average cost of capital, including its most recently authorized rate of return on equity, on the total balance of construction work in progress related to such transmission facilities as of the end of the immediately preceding year. The rate adjustment clause shall be reduced to the extent that the prudently incurred costs being recovered through the adjustment clause have been included in the public utility's base rates as a result of the commission's final order in a rate case.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 481, § 35.

L. 17:

p. 418, § 1.

C.L.

§ 2946.

CSA:

C. 137, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 115-5-1.

L. 61:

p. 628, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-5-1.

L. 2005:

(3) added, p. 1355, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(4) added, p. 267, § 3, effective March 27.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1312), ch. 101, p. 339, § 2, effective April 12.

Cross references:

(1) For the acquisition of public utilities by cities and towns, see § 40-5-104.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act enacting subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 61, Session Laws of Colorado 2007. For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 101, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

40-5-101.5. Investor-owned utilities' service extension policies - commission review - rules.

Within one hundred eighty days after August 9, 2017, the commission shall open a nonadjudicatory proceeding to evaluate investor-owned utilities' current service extension policies for serving new load applications; except that gas-only, investor-owned utilities are not subject to the commission's nonadjudicatory proceeding. Based on the commission's evaluation, the commission shall issue a decision containing recommendations to investor-owned utilities for potential implementation.

In the commission's nonadjudicatory proceeding, the commission shall consider, without limitation, the following information from investor-owned utilities:

The utilities' general load extension procedures used by the utility and requesting customers, including:

The use of construction agreements, revenue assurance agreements, assignment of estimated costs, predevelopment system investment protocols, and options for cost and schedule transparency; and

Potential system automation benefits to enhance clarity of the requirements and process;

Equitable allocation of costs associated with an extension of facilities and any other factors affecting the cost of an extension of facilities; and

Variables that affect time lines for construction and implementation of an extension of facilities.

Within ninety days after the conclusion of the nonadjudicatory proceeding, the commission may promulgate rules consistent with the findings of the nonadjudicatory proceeding.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-271), ch. 310, p. 1673, § 1, effective August 9.

40-5-102. Certificate of public convenience and necessity.

No public utility shall exercise any right or privilege under any franchise, permit, ordinance, vote, or other authority granted after April 12, 1913, or under any franchise, permit, ordinance, vote, or other authority granted before April 12, 1913, but not actually exercised before said date or the exercise of which has been suspended for more than one year without first having obtained from the commission a certificate that public convenience and necessity require the exercise of such right or privilege. When the commission finds, after hearing, that a public utility has, before April 12, 1913, begun actual construction work and is prosecuting such work, in good faith, uninterruptedly, and with reasonable diligence in proportion to the magnitude of the undertaking, under any franchise, permit, ordinance, vote, or other authority granted before April 12, 1913, but not actually exercised before said date, such public utility may proceed, under such rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe, to the completion of such work and after such completion, may exercise such right or privilege. Sections 40-5-101 to 40-5-104 shall not be construed to validate any right or privilege invalid on April 12, 1913, or becoming invalid after said date under any law of this state.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 481, § 35.

L. 17:

p. 418, § 1.

C.L.

§ 2946.

CSA:

C. 137, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 115-5-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-5-2.

40-5-103. Certificate - application for - issuance.

Before any certificate may issue under sections 40-5-101 to 40-5-104, a certified copy of its articles of incorporation or charter, if the applicant is a corporation, shall be filed in the office of the commission. Every applicant for a certificate to exercise franchise rights under section 40-5-102 shall file in the office of the commission such evidence as shall be required by the commission to show that such applicant has received the required consent, franchise, permit, ordinance, vote, or other authority of the proper county, city and county, or municipal or other public authority. The commission has the power to issue a certificate to exercise franchise rights after hearing, to refuse to issue the same, or to issue it for the partial exercise only of said right or privilege and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by such certificate such terms and conditions as in its judgment the public convenience and necessity may require. Nothing contained in this subsection (1) shall be construed to limit or restrict the power and authority of the commission: To regulate, issue, or refuse to issue certificates of public convenience and necessity for construction of a new facility, plant, or system or of any extension thereof as provided in section 40-5-101; and to attach to the exercise of the rights granted by such certificate such terms and conditions as in the commission's judgment may be required by the public convenience and necessity.

If such public utility desires to exercise a right or privilege under a franchise, permit, ordinance, vote, or other authority which it contemplates securing but which has not yet been granted to it, such public utility may apply to the commission for an order preliminary to the issue of the certificate. The commission may thereupon make an order declaring that it will thereafter, upon application, under such rules and regulations as it may prescribe issue the desired certificate upon such terms and conditions as it may designate after such public utility has obtained the contemplated franchise, permit, ordinance, vote, or other authority. Upon the presentation to the commission of evidence satisfactory to it that such franchise, permit, ordinance, vote, or other authority has been secured by such public utility, the commission shall thereupon issue such certificate.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 418, § 35.

L. 17:

p. 418, § 1.

C.L.

§ 2946.

CSA:

C. 137, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 115-5-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-5-3.

L. 69:

p. 937, § 29.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1918, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 629, § 43, effective April 2.

40-5-104. Acquisition by municipality.

Any municipality which has acquired or constructed any public utility plant, property, or facility has the power to contract with a public utility for the operation of any part or the whole thereof, subject to the provisions of articles 1 to 7 of this title and to exercise, in respect to such public utility, the powers of regulation and supervision conferred upon it by the commission.

Sections 40-5-101 to 40-5-104 shall not apply to railroads.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 417, § 1.

C.L.

§ 2946.

CSA:

C. 137, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 115-5-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-5-4.

L. 69:

p. 938, § 30.

40-5-105. Certificate or assets may be sold, assigned, or leased.

The assets of any public utility, including any certificate of public convenience and necessity or rights obtained under any such certificate held, owned, or obtained by any public utility, may be sold, assigned, or leased as any other property, but only upon authorization by the commission and upon such terms and conditions as the commission may prescribe; except that this section does not apply to assets that are sold, assigned, or leased:

In the normal course of business; or

That are owned by a telecommunications service provider and:

Are not used in the provision of regulated telecommunications services; or

Are land and support assets and are not directly used in the provision of regulated telecommunications services.

A telecommunications service provider shall provide notice to the commission of transactions subject to this subparagraph (II), along with the associated accounting entries on the provider's books and records, to permit the commission to determine, if necessary, the disposition of any gain or loss from the transaction.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 526, § 2.

CSA:

C. 137, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 115-5-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-5-5.

L. 69:

p. 938, § 31.

L. 71:

p. 1100, § 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 164, § 1, effective March 17.

40-5-106. Designation for service of process.

It is the duty of every public utility operating in, through, or into the state of Colorado to file with the commission a designation in writing, under oath, of the name and post office address of a person upon whom service of notices or orders in proceedings pending before the commission may be made. Such designation may from time to time be changed by like writing similarly filed. In default of such designation, service of any notice or order may be made by posting such order or notice in the office of the director of the commission and by mailing a copy of such notice or order to such public utility by certified mail, return receipt requested, at its last-known address.

Every public utility operating in, through, or into the state of Colorado shall also file with the director of the commission a designation in writing, under oath, of the name and post office address of a person in the state of Colorado upon whom process issued by or under the authority of any court or board having jurisdiction of the subject matter may be served in any judicial or other proceeding brought against such public utility in this state. Such designation may from time to time be changed by like writing similarly filed. In default of such designation, service may be made upon any agent, representative, or employee of such public utility found within the state. Nothing in this article shall apply to railroad corporations.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 526, § 3.

CSA:

C. 137, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 115-5-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-5-6.

L. 69:

p. 938, § 32.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1704, § 17, effective May 14.

40-5-107. Electric vehicle programs - definitions - repeal.

No later than May 15, 2020, and on or before May 15 every three years thereafter, an electric public utility shall file with the commission an application for a program for regulated activities to support widespread transportation electrification within the area covered by the utility's certificate of public convenience and necessity.

To comply with this subsection (1), an application must seek to minimize overall costs and maximize overall benefits and may include:

Investments or incentives to facilitate the deployment of customer-owned or utility-owned charging infrastructure, including charging facilities, make-ready infrastructure, and associated electrical equipment that support transportation electrification;

Investments or incentives to facilitate the electrification of public transit and other vehicle fleets;

Rate designs, or programs that encourage vehicle charging that supports the operation of the electric grid; and

Customer education, outreach, and incentive programs that increase awareness of the programs and of the benefits of transportation electrification and encourage greater adoption of electric vehicles.

When considering transportation electrification programs and determining cost recovery for investments and other expenditures related to programs proposed by an electric public utility under subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall consider whether the investments and other expenditures are:

Reasonably expected to improve the use of the electric grid, including improved integration of renewable energy;

Reasonably expected to increase access to the use of electricity as a transportation fuel;

Designed to ensure system safety and reliability;

Reasonably expected to contribute to meeting air quality standards, improving air quality in communities most affected by emissions from the transportation sector, and reducing statewide emissions of greenhouse gases by forty percent below 2005 levels by 2030 and eighty percent below 2005 levels by 2050.

This subsection (2)(d) is repealed, effective July 1, 2031.

Reasonably expected to stimulate innovation, competition, and increased consumer choices in electric vehicle charging and related infrastructure and services; attract private capital investments; and utilize high-quality jobs and skilled worker training programs;

Transparent, incorporating public reporting requirements to inform design and commission policy; and

Reasonably expected to provide access for low-income customers, in the totality of the utility's transportation electrification programs, which may include community-based and multi-family charging infrastructure, car share programs, and electrification of public transit, while giving due consideration to the affect on low-income customers.

Electric vehicle infrastructure electrical work on the customer side of the utility meter, including the installation of the charging station apparatus and related hardware, must:

Be performed by a licensed master electrician, licensed journeyman electrician, licensed residential wireman, or properly supervised electrical apprentice as each term is defined in section 12-115-103; and

Comply with article 115 of title 12, including sections 12-115-109 and 12-115-115, and all applicable rules of the state electrical board.

For all electric vehicle infrastructure or charging stations owned by the utility, the utility shall use utility employees or qualified contractors if the contractors' employees have access to an apprenticeship program as defined in section 8-83-308 (3)(a). This apprenticeship requirement does not apply to:

The design, planning, or engineering of the infrastructure;

Management functions to operate the infrastructure; or

Any work included in a warranty.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Industry" means either one or more individual employers or an industry association.

"Skilled worker training program" means an accredited educational, occupational education, as defined in section 23-60-103 (2), apprenticeship, or similar training program that:

Trains or retrains individuals to perform a skill that is needed in the workforce; and

Awards an industry- or state-recognized certificate, credential, associate degree, professional license, or similar evidence of achievement upon completion of the program.

"Skilled worker training program" does not include an educational program that awards a bachelor's or higher degree upon completion of the program.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-077), ch. 383, p. 3435, § 4, effective May 31.

L. 2020:

(2)(e) and IP(3)(b) amended and (4) added, (HB 20-1395), ch. 137, p. 594, § 7, effective June 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-077, see section 1 of chapter 383, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

40-5-108. Electric utility participation in organized wholesale markets required - conditions - authority of commission - legislative declaration - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Organized wholesale market" or "OWM" means a regional transmission organization, also known as an RTO, or an independent system operator, also known as an ISO, established for the purpose of coordinating and efficiently managing the dispatch and transmission of electricity among public utilities on a multistate or regional basis and that:

Is approved by the federal energy regulatory commission;

Effects separate control of transmission facilities from control of generation facilities;

Implements, to the extent reasonably possible, policies and procedures designed to minimize pancaked transmission rates within Colorado;

Improves, to the extent reasonably possible, service reliability within Colorado;

Is of sufficient scope or otherwise operates to substantially increase economical supply options for customers;

Has a structure of governance or control that is independent of the ownership and operation of the transmission facilities, and no member of its board of directors has an affiliation with a user or with an affiliate of a user during the member's tenure on the board so as to unduly affect the OWM's performance. As used in this subsection (1)(a)(VI), "user" means any entity or affiliate of that entity that buys or sells electric energy in the OWM's region or in a neighboring region.

Improves emission-reduction and customer-savings benefits to Colorado customers from operation within the western interconnection without significantly impairing actions taken by public utilities to meet the emission-reduction goals of sections 25-7-102 and 40-2-125.5 and to continue to advance the objectives of those sections;

Has an inclusive and open stakeholder process that does not place unreasonable burdens on, or preclude meaningful participation by, any stakeholder group;

Includes all transmission and generation resources approved, acquired, or constructed and in service by 2030 to meet the emission reduction requirements of sections 25-7-102 and 40-2-125.5; and

Consistent with and in support of FERC policies and orders and local planning by Colorado public utilities, is capable of: Planning for improved efficiency of use, future expansion, and consideration of all options for meeting transmission needs; providing effective cost allocations that reflect benefits of transmission investments; maintaining real-time reliability of the electric transmission system while promoting more efficient use of the transmission system in Colorado and neighboring areas in the western interconnection; ensuring comparable and nondiscriminatory transmission access and necessary services; minimizing system congestion; and further addressing real or potential transmission constraints.

"Transmission utility" means a public utility that:

Is a wholesale electricity supplier or transmitter; and

Owns and operates electric transmission lines capable of transmitting electric energy at a voltage of one hundred kilovolts or more.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(a)(II) of this section, and except for municipally owned utilities and power authorities, all Colorado transmission utilities shall join an organized wholesale market on or before January 1, 2030.
(2) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(a)(II) of this section, and except for municipally owned utilities and power authorities, all Colorado transmission utilities shall join an organized wholesale market on or before January 1, 2030.

Upon application by a transmission utility, the commission may waive or delay the requirement stated in subsection (2)(a)(I) of this section if:

The commission has determined that the transmission utility has made all reasonable efforts to comply with the requirement but there is no viable and available OWM that the transmission utility can join by January 1, 2030; and

The commission has determined that requiring the transmission utility to join an OWM is not in the public interest based on the commission's evaluation of appropriate factors, including whether the OWM has established policies regarding tracking and reporting of emissions with a system to attribute emissions to transmission owners, promoting load flexibility and demand-side resources, promoting the integration of clean energy resources, and reducing the costs and inefficiencies of transactions between balancing areas and between market constructs, if any.

The commission is directed to participate on behalf of the state of Colorado, as it deems appropriate, in proceedings before the FERC involving the management of physical connections, sharing of data, and interpretation and implementation of tariff and business practices between OWMs whose boundaries meet within Colorado.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that the participation of transmission utilities in OWMs and the implementation of the "Colorado Electric Transmission Authority Act", article 42 of this title 40, will assist transmission utilities and the Colorado electric transmission authority in ensuring the resilience of the electric grid and its resistance to both natural disasters and intentional attacks. Accordingly, the commission is directed to use all available means to support these entities in preparing for, and documenting their ability to mitigate, any threats identified in the Colorado energy assurance emergency plan.

The commission shall consider allowing, and may allow, a transmission utility that joins an OWM to recover OWM subscription fees and other prudently incurred costs of participation in the OWM through rates or through a new or existing transmission rider.

The commission shall allow a transmission utility that commences operation with an OWM to collect and retain a specified percentage of the demonstrated net present value savings accruing to Colorado customers from participation in the OWM for a period of five years beginning on the date the transmission utility commences operation with the OWM. The commission shall allow a transmission utility to retain up to thirty-five percent of such savings in years one and two, twenty-five percent in year three, and twenty percent in years four and five.

A transmission utility may apply to the commission to implement a proposed shared savings approach and to establish a proceeding to determine the net present value savings accruing to Colorado customers from the participation of the transmission utility in an OWM for the period beginning on the date the transmission utility commences operation with the OWM and ending on July 31, 2033.

In any proceeding conducted by the commission under subsection (3)(c) of this section, the transmission utility shall have the burden of proof to demonstrate net present value savings, and intervenors shall have the opportunity to participate and offer evidence regarding the transmission utility's demonstration of net present value savings. The commission shall issue a final order determining the amount of net present value savings that a transmission utility may collect and retain pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be used or interpreted by the commission to delay or impede electric resource planning proceedings filed on or before December 31, 2025, including the approval, acquisition, or construction of generation and transmission resources prior to a transmission utility's entry into an OWM and any acquisitions that are part of or ancillary to an electric resource plan that includes a clean energy plan approved pursuant to section 25-7-102 or 40-2-125.5.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-072), ch. 329, p. 2111, § 2, effective June 24.